District of Columbia statutes.
39-404

Rulemaking.

The Mayor shall promulgate rules and regulations, pursuant to Chapter 5 of Title 2, setting forth the criteria and standards for providing economic assistance under this chapter.

Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-271, § 5, 52 DCR 820